src-fst-phonology.twolc.md
# Skolt Sámi TWOLC file

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

# Introduction
The twolc rule file for Skolt Saami is divided into 5 main sections:
1. Alphabets, Sets and Definitions
1. Consonant shift rules (tbw)
1. Vowel alternation rules
1. Consonant gradation rules
1. Rules for cleaning up and composing end result

# Alphabets, sets and definitions

## Alphabet

Regular letters:

```
* a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
* A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
* ä å â õ
* Ä Å Â Õ
* č ǩ ǯ ǧ ž đ ǥ ʒ š ŋ
* Č Ǩ Ǯ Ǧ Ž Đ Ǥ Ʒ Š Ŋ
* ẹ Pedagogical purposes
* Ẹ Pedagogical purposes
* 
* æ ø ö á é í
* Æ Ø Ö Á
* É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð
* é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ª ß ç
```

Orthographic, suprasegmental markers:

* `ʹ` - MODIFIER LETTER PRIME: U+02B9 suprasegmental palatization
* `ʼ` - MODIFIER LETTER APOSTROPHE: U+02BC Syllable marker that appears in writing
* `ˈ` - MODIFIER LETTER VERTICAL LINE: U+02C8 as overlong consonant marker that does not appear in writing except for pedagogical purposes

Symbol pairs for consonant lengthening:
* __%{XC%}:m__
* __%{XC%}:n__
* __%{XC%}:v__
* __%{XC%}:d__
* __%{XC%}:r__
* __%{XC%}:l__
* __%{XC%}:k__
* __%{XC%}:ǥ__
* __%{XC%}:s__
* __%{XC%}:š__
* __%{XC%}:z__
* __%{XC%}:ž__

Symbol pairs for vowel length:
* __%{õuØ%}:0__
* __%{ouØ%}:0__
* __%{âõØ%}:0__
* __%{ẹiØ%}:0__
* __%{äaØ%}:0__
* __%{äåØ%}:0__
* __%{eiØ%}:0__
* __%{åoØ%}:0__
* __%{ẹeiØ%}:0__

Symbol pairs for vowel height, by default vowels are low:
* __%{õu%}:õ__
* __%{ou%}:o__
* __%{âõ%}:â__
* __%{ẹi%}:ẹ__
* __%{äa%}:ä__
* __%{äå%}:ä__
* __%{ei%}:e__
* __%{åo%}:å__
* __%{ẹei%}:ẹ__
* __%{âõe%}:â__
* __%{âõäe%}:â__

Trigger symbols:
* __%^Pen:0__ - for combinations 2015-09-28 Miikka
* __%^RmVow:0__ - for removing vowels e, â, a before final consonant in stem
* __%^UltRmVow:0__ - for removing vowels e, â, a after final consonant in stem
* __%^RmCns:0__ - for removing stem final consonant, e.g. final z in ǩeeʹstes:ǩeâsttez ǩeâstta
* __%^1VOW:0__ - Vow trigger
* __%^2VOW:0__ - Vow trigger
* __%^3VOW:0__ - Vow trigger
* __%^4VOW:0__ - Vow trigger
* __%^5VOW:0__ - Vow trigger
* __%^VOWLower:0__ - i>e, õ>â, â>ä, u>o, o>å
* __%^VOWRaise:0__ - e>i, ä>e
* __%^U2Õ:0__ - lowers u>õ
* __%^PAL:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALNo:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALI:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALE:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALÄ:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALẸ:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALÂ:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALÕ:0__ - Palatalisation

Penultimate Palatalisation
* __%^PALK:0__ - causes k:ǩ and g:ǧ and ǥ:j

Miscellaneous triggers:
* %^VC:0 Voicing s:z š:ž
* %^Â:0 Indicates placement of â in stem

CHARACTERISTIC BREAKDOWN 2015-02-17

* __%^VV2V:0__ - Shortens vowel
* __%^V2VV:0__ - Lengthens vowel
* __%^CC2C:0__ - Shortens consonant
* __%^CC2CAllegro:0__ - Shortens consonant
* __%^C2CC:0__ - Lengthens consonant
* __%^CC2CCC:0__ - Strong to Extra Strong consonant
* __%^CCC2C:0__ - Extra Strong to Weak consonant
* __%^CCC2CAllegro:0__ - Extra Strong to Weak consonant
* __%^CCC2CC:0__ - Extra Strong to Strong consonant
* __%^XYY2XY:0__ - Shortens consonant cluster
* __%^XYY2VY:0__ - Consonant cluster to vowel and consonant sijdd:siid
* __%^XYY2VYY:0__ - Consonant cluster to vowel and geminate uvdd:ouʹdd
* __%^XYY2IY:0__ - Consonant cluster to i  and consonant kueʹhtt:kueiʹt
* __%^VY2XYY:0__ - Consonant cluster i/u to j/v
* __%^VYY2XYY:0__ - Consonant cluster i/u to j/v
* __%^KK2ZERO:0__ - nââʹer
* __%^KKK2ZERO:0__ - jeeʹel
* __%^KKK2GG:0__ - Geminate weakening
* __%^KKK2G:0__ - Strong Geminate allegro
* __%^KK2GG:0__ - Geminate weakening jokk:jooǥǥ
* __%^KK2GAllegro:0__ - Geminate weakening in allegro pååss:påz
* __%^K2GG:0__ - Geminate weakening čårrõs:čårrõõzz
* __%^K2GAllegro:0__ - Geminate weakening in allegro čâustõk

Removal of suprasegmentals

* __%{ʹØ%}:0__ - This is modifier letter prime
* __%{ʼØ%}:0__ - used between l, n, j and subsequent j and elsewhere
* __%{ˈ1%}:0__ - This is modifier letter verticle line after diphthongs

This introduces vertical bar after diphth before consonants
* %^Allegro:0 This introduces vertical bar after diphth before consonants

Various semi-vowel alternations
* %^J2I:0 in tuâjj:tuâi
* %^I2J:0 in agent names
* %^I2Zero:0 in agent names

Gradation triggers 2015.01.23
* %^XSt2St:0 Causes weakening from extra strong to strong
* %^XSt2W:0 Causes weakening from extra strong to weak
* %^St2W:0 Causes weakening from strong to weak
* %^W2St:0 Causes strengthening from weak to strong
* %^W2XSt:0 Causes strengthening from weak to extra strong
* %^St2XSt:0 Causes strengthening from strong to extra strong

Other vowel length and consonant length will be phased out
* %^VOWXSH:0 Extra shortens vowel in relation to consonant
* %^VOWXL:0 Extra lengthens vowel in relation to consonant in nouns, for example
* %^CXLong:0 Lengthening
* %^CLong:0 Lengthening
* %^CShort:0 Shortening

More triggers, possibly realised as a segment:

<!-- {% raw %} -->
* `X3:0` causes weak grade
* `%{VU%}:u` used with stuuʹl
* `%{Â1%}:0` used with "mainsted" to tell (a story)
* `%{A1%}:0` used with "vuejted" to drive (causative)
* `%{E1%}:0` used with "kåʹmrded" to bow
* `%{E1%}:0` archiform for MODIFIER LETTER ACUTE ACCENT used in stems where the lemma does not contain a MODIFIER LETTER ACUTE ACCENT and yet the paradigm requires one.
* `%{EÂ%}:e` archiform for ie:eâ variation
* `%^IMPSG2:0`
* `%^INDPRSSG3:0`
* `%^PenVow2a:0` Changes penultimate vowel to a; e:a â:a
* `%^FRICG:0`

Hyphen at compound word boundary
* `%^FRICG:0` Zero versus hyphen in compounding
* `%^Hyphen:0` at compound word boundary with %-
* `%^NoHyphen:0` at compound word boundary
<!-- {% endraw %} -->

Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries below):

* »
* «
* >
* <

Morpheme boundaries:
* Derivational prefix
* Derivational suffix
* Inflectional prefix
* Inflectional suffix
* Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
* (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
* Hyphen for question particle
* Compounding rules

End of alphabet definitions

## Sets

* Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z Đ Ʒ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;
* CNoV = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T W X Z Đ Ʒ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;

* CNoJ = b c d f g h k l m n p q r s t v w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C D F G H K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z Đ Ʒ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;

* Vow = a e ẹ i o u å ä â õ
  A E Ẹ I O U Å Ä Â Õ ;
* VowNoIU = a e ẹ o å ä â õ
  A E Ẹ O Å Ä Â Õ ;

* CNoJV = b c d f g h k l m n p q r s t w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C D F G H K L M N P Q R S T W X Z Đ Ʒ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;

* CNoDLRZ = b c f g h j k m n p q s t v w x z đ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C F G H J K M N P Q S T V W X Z Đ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;

* Ltrs = Vow Cns ;

* Dummy = %^PAL %^PALE %^PALẸ %^PALÕ %^PALÄ
  %^CC2C %^CCC2C %^CCC2CC %^XYY2IY %^XYY2XY
  %^KK2GG %^XYY2VY %^KKK2GG %^KKK2ZERO %^C2CC
  %^J2I %^Pen %^V2VV %^VOWLower %^RmVow
  %^PenVow2a %^RmCns %^VC %^V2VV
  %^VOWRaise %^VOWSH %^CLong %^K2GG ; - triggers in Sg.Nom and Sg.Gen

## Definitions

### Short consonant cluster

Onset consonant or word boundary
`OnSetC = [[%{XC%}:Cns\|Cns:Cns] (Cns:\|%{XC%}:Cns) \|.#.\|#:\|%>\](») ;`

Penultimate consonant
`PenUltCns = [Cns:\](%{XC%}:) ;`

following morpheme or word boundary

<!-- {% raw %} -->
```
* RBound = [(%^Hyphen: %-|%^NoHyphen:|%{%-Ø%}:) #:|.#.|%>|»|%-] ;
```
<!-- {% endraw %} -->

ossible triggers before VOWLower and VOWRaise

`BetweenStemAndHeight =  ( %^VV2V: \|%^V2VV:)`

possible triggers before PALE PALÄ
`BetweenStemAndPALAllo = [ BetweenStemAndHeight (%^VOWLower:](%^VOWRaise:))`

possible triggers between stem and PALNo and PAL
`BetweenStemAndPALNo = [ BetweenStemAndHeight [(%^VOWLower:\|%^VOWRaise:) (%^PALÄ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:\](%^PALÂ:)] (%^Allegro:) ) ; `

possible triggers between vowel length and consonant grade
`BetweenVowLenghtAndConsGrade = [ (%^VOWRaise:\|%^VOWLower:) ( ((%^PALÂ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:\|%^VOWLower: %^PALÄ:\|(%^PALÕ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:)\| (%^Allegro:) (%^PALÕ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÂ:) (%^PALNo:\](%^PAL:) ) ) ;`

possible triggers between word end and consonant grade
`BetweenStemAndConsGrade = [ BetweenStemAndHeight BetweenVowLenghtAndConsGrade ];`

possible triggers between vowel length and Palatalization
`BetweenVowLengthAndPALNo = [(%^VOWLower:\|%^VOWRaise:) (%^PALÄ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:\](%^PALÂ:) ) ;`

`BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade = [((%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:\|(%^PALÂ:\](%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:)) ;`

`BetweenVowHeightAndMorph = [  ((%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:\|(%^PALÂ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:) ([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]\|%^C2CC:\|%^XYY2XY:\|%^K2GG:\|%^KK2GG:\|%^CC2CCC:\|%^CCC2C:\|%^CCC2CC:\|%^XYY2VY:\|%^XYY2VYY:\](%^KKK2GG:) RBound ) ;`

`BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]\|%^C2CC:\|%^XYY2XY:\|%^K2GG:\|%^KK2GG:\|%^CC2CCC:\|%^CCC2C:\|%^CCC2CC:\|%^XYY2VY:\|%^XYY2VYY:\](%^KKK2GG:) ) ;`

`BetweenPALNoAndMorph = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]\|%^C2CC:\|%^XYY2XY:\|%^K2GG:\|%^KK2GG:\|%^CC2CCC:\|%^CCC2C:\|%^CCC2CC:\|%^XYY2VY:\|%^XYY2VYY:\](%^KKK2GG:) RBound ) ;`

`BetweenStemAndRightArrow = [BetweenStemAndConsGrade BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow] ;`

### Penultimate vowel centers possible triggers before VOWLower and VOWRaise

`PenBetweenStemAndHeight = [(%^Pen: %^VV2V: \](%^Pen: %^V2VV:)) ;`

`PenBetweenStemAndPALNo = [PenBetweenStemAndHeight (%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:\](%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) ) ;`

`PenBetweenStemAndPALAllo  = [ PenBetweenStemAndHeight (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:\](%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:)) ;`

`PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade = [PenBetweenStemAndHeight ((%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:\|%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) ((%^Pen: %^PALÂ:\|%^Pen: %^PALÕ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PALNo:\|(%^Pen: %^PALÕ:\|%^Pen: %^PALE:\|%^Pen: %^PALÄ:\](%^Pen: %^PALẸ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PAL:) ) ) ;`

`PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss = [PenBetweenStemAndHeight [(%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:\|%^Pen: %^VOWLower:\|%^Pen: %^U2Õ:) ((%^Pen: %^PALÂ:\|%^Pen: %^PALÕ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PALNo:\|(%^Pen: %^PALE:\|%^Pen: %^PALÄ:\|%^Pen: %^PALẸ:\|%^Pen: %^PALÕ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PAL:)] ([%^Pen: %^C2CC:]\|%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|%^Allegro:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]\|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:\|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2CC:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:\](%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:)) ;`

`PenBetweenStemAndStemFinalVoicing = [PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss (%^RmVow:\](%^PenVow2a:)) ;`

`PenBetweenPALNoAndMorph = [(%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]\|%^Pen: %^C2CC:\|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:\|%^Pen: %^KK2GG:\|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2CC:\|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:\|%^Pen: %^XYY2VYY:\](%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:) RBound ) ;`

used in compounding Cmp/SgNom and Cmp/SgGen
`SgNomGen = [((%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2C:\|(%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2CC:\|%^PALẸ:\|[%^PALE:\|%^PALÕ:] %^PAL: %^XYY2IY:\|[%^PALẸ:\|%^PALE:] %^PAL: %^XYY2XY:\|((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG:\|(%^PALE:) %^PAL:\| ((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) (%^J2I:) %^CC2C:\](%^PAL: %^XYY2VY:));`

neutral to vowel height and backness

`NeutrHighBack = [(%^VOWLower:\](%^VOWRaise:) ) ; `

neutral to vowel length

`VNeutrGrade = [(%^VV2V: \](%^V2VV: ));`

neutral to consonant length

`CNeutrGrade = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:] \|[%^C2CC:] \|%^CC2CCC: \|%^KK2GG: \|%^KKK2GG: \|%^XYY2VY: \|%^XYY2VYY:\](%^CCC2CC: )) ;`

neutral to vowel and consonant length

`NeutrGrade = [VNeutrGrade \](CNeutrGrade) ; `

`NoVowRaise = \[ %^VOWRaise: \| #]* [#\](.#.) ;`

`NoCnsDummy = \[ %^CC2C: \| %^CCC2C: \| %^CCC2CC: \| %^XYY2IY: \| %^XYY2XY: \| %^KK2GG: \| %^XYY2VY: \| %^KKK2GG: \| %^KKK2ZERO: \| %^C2CC: \| %^J2I: \| %^RmCns: \| %^K2GG: \]( # )* ;`
